Massachusetts, session 194th, H1608.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 258E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Harassment” and inserting
in place thereof the following definition:-
“Harassment”, (i) 3 or more acts of willful and malicious conduct aimed at a specific
person committed with the intent to caucus fear, intimidation, abuse or damage to property and
that does in face cause fear, intimidation, abuse or damage to property; or (ii) an act that: (A) by
force, threat or duress causes another to involuntarily engage in sexual relations; or (B)
constitutes a violation of section 13B, 13F, 13H, 22, 22A, 23, 24, 24B, 26C, 37, 39, 43 or 43A of
chapter 265 or section 3 of chapter 272.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 39 of chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out the first sentence and replacing it thereof with the following sentence:- (a) Whoever
commits an assault or a battery upon a person or the relative thereof or damages the real or
personal property of a person with the intent to intimidate such person because of such person's
race, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability shall be
punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or by imprisonment in a house of
correction for not more than two and one-half years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
of 2